Illinois, session 104th, HB4356.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Section 23-20 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/23-20)7    Sec. 23-20. Effect of protested payments; refunds. No 8protest shall prevent or be a cause of delay in the 9distribution of tax collections to the taxing districts of any 10taxes collected which were not paid under protest. If the 11final order of the Property Tax Appeal Board or of a court 12results in a refund to the taxpayer, refunds shall be made by 13the collector from funds remaining in the Protest Fund until 14such funds are exhausted and thereafter from the next funds 15collected after entry of the final order until full payment of 16the refund and interest thereon has been made. Interest from 17the date of payment, regardless of whether the payment was 18made before the effective date of this amendatory Act of 1997, 19or from the date payment is due, whichever is later, to the 20date of refund shall also be paid to the taxpayer at the annual 21rate of the lesser of (i) 5% or (ii) the percentage increase in 22the Consumer Price Index For All Urban Consumers during the 2312-month calendar year preceding the levy year for which the   HB4356- 2 -LRB104 16906 HLH 30317 b1refund was made, as published by the federal Bureau of Labor 2Statistics.3    A claim for a refund resulting from a final order of the 4Property Tax Appeal Board, an order of the circuit court 5pursuant to Section 23-15 or Section 14-15 of this Code, a 6certificate of error certified pursuant to Section 14-15 of 7this Code, or a certificate of error issued pursuant to 8Section 14-25 of this Code shall not be allowed unless the 9claim is filed within 20 years from the date the right to a 10refund arose; provided, however, that the aggregate total of 11refunded taxes and interest shall not exceed $5,000,000 in any 12calendar year for claims filed more than 7 years after the 13right to the refund arose. If the payment of a claim for a 14refund would cause the aggregate total of taxes and interest 15to exceed $5,000,000 in any year, the refund shall be paid in 16the next succeeding year.17    The changes made to this Section by this amendatory Act of 18the 103rd General Assembly apply to matters concerning refund 19claims filed on or after the first day of the first month 20following the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 21103rd General Assembly.22    The changes made to this Section by this amendatory Act of 23the 104th General Assembly apply to matters concerning refund 24claims filed on or after the first day of the first month 25following the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 26104th General Assembly.   HB4356- 3 -LRB104 16906 HLH 30317 b1(Source: P.A. 103-655, eff. 7-19-24.) 2    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 3becoming law.